Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 4. Employment of Children and Aliens

§ 430.
Policy; definitions; rules.

It is the policy of Vermont that children shall be protected from employment in harmful and dangerous occupations. Toward this end, Vermont law should reflect federal protections regarding the employment of children, but should continue to provide additional protection for children in Vermont where particular circumstances warrant greater protection for children.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

“Child” or “children” means an individual under the age of 18 years.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor or designee.

“Employee” means any individual suffered or permitted to work by an employer.

“Illegal child employment” means the employment of any child under the age of 18 in any work or occupation specifically prohibited by State or federal law. “Illegal child employment” does not include work performed by students as part of an educational program, provided this subchapter or federal law specifically permits this work.

The Commissioner shall adopt rules to carry out the purpose and intent of this subchapter, provided the rules are consistent with federal child labor laws and rules. However, the Commissioner shall not be required to adopt or modify rules in order to conform with a change in federal child labor laws or regulations which weakens or eliminates an existing child labor protection policy.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 68

, § 1; amended

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 431.
Age limit; certificate as to eligibility of child under 16.

Except as provided in this subchapter, a child under 16 years of age shall not be employed in any gainful occupation unless the child deposits with the employer a certificate from the Commissioner that states that the child is eligible for employment in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter. However, this requirement shall not apply to any child employed during vacations or before or after sessions of school when the employment is not otherwise prohibited by this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1999, No. 69

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 68

, § 2.

§ 432.
Restrictions.

The Commissioner shall not issue a certificate for a child under 16 pursuant to section 431 of this title until the Commissioner has received, examined, approved, and filed the following papers:

The school record of the child properly filled out and signed by the person in charge of the school which the child last attended, giving the child’s age, address, standing in studies, rating in conduct, and attendance in days during the school year of the last full year of attendance.

Evidence of the age of the child as follows:

The birth certificate of the child, or a copy certified by the town clerk in a town where the certificate is a part of the public records.

If the certificate or certified copy cannot be procured, a duly attested transcript of the certificate of birth or baptism or other religious record, shall be conclusive evidence of the age of the child.

In case no documentary proof of age is available, the Commissioner may accept an affidavit from the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child to establish the age of the child.

A certificate from a physician resident in and licensed to practice in this State showing that after a thorough examination the child is found to be physically fit to be employed in the proposed occupation. When a certificate is requested for the employment of a child under 16 as an actor or performer in motion pictures, theatrical productions, radio, or television, this provision may be waived at the discretion of the Commissioner.

Before a certificate approving the employment of a child as an actor or performer in motion pictures, theatrical productions, radio, or television is issued by the Commissioner, the Secretary of Education must approve the substance and conditions of the educational program being provided to the child during this employment which in no case shall be more than 90 days during the school year.

The Commissioner shall refuse a certificate to a child under 16 years of age unless the child has completed the elementary school course, or received an equivalent education, or has been excused from further school attendance under the provisions of

16 V.S.A. § 1123

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 4

, § 1, eff. March 10, 1987;

2001, No. 68

, § 3;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 262, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 433.
Repealed. 2001, No. 68, § 16(1).

§ 434.
Employment of children under 16.

A child under 16 years of age shall not be employed more than eight hours in any day, or more than six days in any week, or earlier than seven o’clock in the morning, or after seven o’clock at night, except from June 1 through Labor Day when a child may be permitted to work until nine o’clock at night. A child under 16 years of age shall not be employed more than three hours on any day that school is in session, and not more than a total of 18 hours during any week that school is in session. However, in the case of a child employed as an actor or performer in motion pictures, theatrical productions, radio, or television, or employed as a baseball bat girl or bat boy, the child may be employed until midnight or after midnight if a parent or guardian and the Commissioner of Labor have consented in writing. The Department shall adopt rules regarding the permissible duties of a baseball bat girl or bat boy. The provisions of this section shall not apply to employment as a newspaper carrier or work connected with agriculture or domestic service.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 4

, § 2, eff. March 10, 1987; amended

1987, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), eff. April 13, 1988;

1999, No. 69

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 68

, § 4;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006.

§ 435.
Examination and report.

When so ordered by the Secretary of Education, the superintendent of schools for the school district where the child under 16 years of age resides shall examine the child for the purpose of determining the child’s eligibility for employment in accordance with the provisions of section 432 of this title and shall, upon the completion of the examination, make a written report to the Secretary of Education who shall transmit a copy of the report to the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 5;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 263, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2017, No. 74

, § 35.

§ 436.
Employment of children under 14 years.

A child under 14 years of age shall not be employed or permitted to work in any gainful occupation unless the occupation has been approved by the Commissioner, by rule, to be appropriate for a child under the age of 14, and the employment occurs during vacation and before and after school. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:

Employment by a parent or a person standing in place of a parent employing his or her own child or a child in his or her custody in an occupation other than manufacturing, mining, or an occupation found by the U.S. Secretary of Labor to be particularly hazardous or detrimental to their health or well-being.

A newspaper carrier.

An actor or performer in motion pictures, theatrical productions, radio, and television.

HISTORY:

Amended

1987, No. 4

, § 3, eff. March 10, 1987;

2001, No. 68

, § 6;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 127.

§ 437.
Employment of children; special restrictions; hours for children under 16 years.

Except as provided in section 438 of this title, a child shall not be employed or permitted to work at or on any occupations, employment, operations, or machines determined to be hazardous, by rule, by the U.S. Secretary of Labor or the Commissioner.

A child under 16 years of age shall not be employed more than eight hours in any one day or more than 40 hours in any one week.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 7;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 128.

§ 438.
Exceptions.

A child over 14 years of age, who is enrolled in a career technical education program or course duly approved by the State Board of Education, may be legally employed in any of the occupations or operations named in section 437 of this title or other occupations or operations that may be in the estimation of the State Board of Education a necessary or essential part of the student’s career technical education, provided that the plant, work places, machinery, and other appliances and equipment used for instruction have been inspected for safe conditions and approved by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2001, No. 68

, § 8;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 302, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 439.
Repealed. 1969, No. 218 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 440.
Repealed. 2001, No. 68, § 16(2).

§ 441.
Repealed. 2001, No. 68, § 16(5).

§ 442.
Posting notices of hours of labor.

An employer shall post in a conspicuous place in the place in which a child is employed a printed notice describing permitted and prohibited operations, occupations, and machines at which a child may be employed, stating the number of hours’ work permitted on each day of the week, the hours of commencing and stopping work, and the hours when the time allowed for meals begins and ends. The printed forms of this notice shall be provided by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 10.

§ 443.
Repealed. 2001, No. 68, § 16(3).

§ 444.
Repealed. 1969, No. 218 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 444a.
Employment of aliens.

For the purposes of this section:

“Alien” means any person not a citizen of the United States.

“Employer” means any person, including any partnership, firm, corporation, or association, or any agent thereof, who engages or utilizes the personal services of one or more individuals for a salary or wage.

“Illegal alien” means any person not a citizen of the United States who has entered the United States in violation of the Federal Immigration and Naturalization Act or regulations issued thereunder, who has legally entered but without the right to be employed in the country, or who has legally entered subject to a time limit but has remained illegally after expiration of such time limit.

No employer or agent for an employer shall knowingly recruit, solicit, or refer for employment, or employ, an illegal alien.

No employer shall knowingly employ any alien unless the employer determines that the alien possesses the required certificate under the Federal Immigration and Naturalization Act or regulations issued thereunder, or has authorization from the immigration services.

A person convicted of violating this section shall be fined not less than $100.00 or more than $300.00 for conviction of a first offense. For any subsequent offense, a person convicted of violating this section shall be fined not less than $300.00, nor more than $750.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 99

.

§ 445.
Repealed. 1969, No. 218 (Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 446.
Duties of Commissioner as to employment of children.

The Commissioner may inquire of the owner or superintendent of any place or establishment as to the employment of children, may request to see the certificate filed with the owner or superintendent, and shall ensure that the provisions of this subchapter have been complied with.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 11.

§ 447.
Repealed. 2001, No. 68, § 16(4).

§ 448.
Duty of person having control of child.

A person having control of a child shall not allow the child to be employed contrary to a provision of this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 12.

§ 449.
General penalty.

A person who violates a provision of this subchapter for which another penalty is not provided shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 for each offense and, upon a subsequent conviction, may be fined or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1981, No. 223

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2001, No. 68

, § 13.

§ 450.
Repealed. 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 451.
Complaints.

Truant officers and all informing officers are authorized to make complaints for violations or offenses arising under this subchapter.
A complaint for a violation of section 448 of this title shall be sufficient if it states that the person having control of a child has allowed such child to be employed contrary to law.

§ 452.
Suspension of subchapter.

The Commissioner, with the approval of the Governor, may suspend part or all of the provisions of this subchapter for a period not to exceed two months in any one year in the case of a manufacturing establishment or business, the materials and products of which are perishable and require immediate labor to prevent decay or damage.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 14.

§ 453.
Sale of goods made in violation of subchapter.

No person, partnership, corporation, or association shall knowingly sell, offer, or expose for sale, take orders for the future delivery of, or possess with intent to sell any article, product, or compound in the production, manufacture, or distribution of which children have been employed in violation of the provisions of this subchapter, or in a manner or under conditions that would be in violation of these provisions if the employment had occurred in this State. Any complaint alleging a violation of this section shall be filed with the Commissioner, who shall investigate, and if the Commissioner determines there is sufficient evidence to substantiate the allegations, shall transmit the complaint to the Attorney General or to the State’s Attorney of the county in which the violation is alleged to have occurred. A person who violates a provision of this section shall be fined not more than $10,000.00.

HISTORY:

Amended

2001, No. 68

, § 15.